Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1109
Recognizance forfeited; judgment; remission; conditions.

After entry of such judgment on the recognizance, the court may remit it in whole or in part under the conditions applying to the setting aside of forfeiture as provided in section 29-1107.

Laws 1953, c. 88, § 4, p. 260.

It is within the discretion of the trial court to remit a part or all of the penalty of a bail bond. State v. Ernest, 203 Neb. 290, 278 N.W.2d 355 (1979).

Procedure followed was proper to obtain a remission of bail. State v. Seaton, 170 Neb. 687, 103 N.W.2d 833 (1960).

Remission of part or all of penalty on forfeiture of recognizance rests in sound discretion of trial court. State v. Konvalin, 165 Neb. 499, 86 N.W.2d 361 (1957) .